Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF2721.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [299F.49] DEFINITIONS. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Scope. new text end new text begin As used in sections 299F.49 and 299F.491, the terms defined in this section have the meanings given. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Approved skill training program or program. new text end new text begin "Approved skill training program" or "program" means an apprenticeship program that is registered under chapter 178 or Code of Federal Regulations, title 29, part 29. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Building. new text end new text begin "Building" means a building equipped with fire life safety dampers, a smoke control system, or an HVAC duct system that contains fire life safety dampers or is part of a smoke control system. Building does not include single family residential buildings or multifamily buildings with four or fewer units. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Combination fire smoke damper. new text end new text begin "Combination fire smoke damper" means a device that meets both the fire damper and smoke damper requirements. new text end new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Dedicated smoke control system. new text end new text begin "Dedicated smoke control system" means a smoke control system and components that are installed for the sole purpose of providing smoke control and that upon activation of the systems operate specifically to perform the smoke control function. new text end new text begin Subd. 6. new text end new text begin Fire damper. new text end new text begin "Fire damper" means a device installed in an air distribution system that is designed to close automatically upon detection of heat, to interrupt migratory airflow and to restrict the passage of flame. Fire damper includes devices installed in air conditioning systems to close automatically upon detection of heat, to interrupt migratory airflow, and to restrict the passage of flames. A fire damper also includes a combination fire smoke damper. new text end new text begin Subd. 7. new text end new text begin Fire life safety dampers. new text end new text begin "Fire life safety dampers" means all fire dampers, smoke dampers, and combination fire and smoke dampers. new text end new text begin Subd. 8. new text end new text begin Fire life safety damper testing. new text end new text begin "Fire life safety damper testing" means testing and inspection activities, including all physical, visual, and operational tests necessary to ensure the complete opening, closing, and the proper functioning of fire life safety dampers as required by the IFC, NFPA 80, NFPA 101, NFPA 105, and applicable engineering specifications of these systems. new text end new text begin Subd. 9. new text end new text begin HVAC. new text end new text begin "HVAC" means heating, ventilation, and air conditioning. new text end new text begin Subd. 10. new text end new text begin ICB. new text end new text begin "ICB" means the International Certification Board. new text end new text begin Subd. 11. new text end new text begin IFC. new text end new text begin "IFC" means the International Fire Code. new text end new text begin Subd. 12. new text end new text begin Independent contractor. new text end new text begin "Independent contractor" means a company that is not owned or managed by the building owner, or an immediate family member of the building owner, of the building being inspected and includes any subsidiary companies of the independent contractor. new text end new text begin Subd. 13. new text end new text begin ISO/IEC 17024. new text end new text begin "ISO/IEC 17024" means the International Organization for Standardization/International Electrotechnical Commission 17024 international standard for Conformity Assessment - General Requirements for Bodies Operating Certification of Persons. new text end new text begin Subd. 14. new text end new text begin NFPA. new text end new text begin "NFPA" means the National Fire Protection Association. new text end new text begin Subd. 15. new text end new text begin NFPA 80. new text end new text begin "NFPA 80" means the current adopted version of the Standard for Fire Doors and Other Opening Protectives. new text end new text begin Subd. 16. new text end new text begin NFPA 92. new text end new text begin "NFPA 92" means the current version of the Standard for Smoke Control Systems. new text end new text begin Subd. 17. new text end new text begin NFPA 101. new text end new text begin "NFPA 101" means the current adopted version of the Standard for Life Safety Code. new text end new text begin Subd. 18. new text end new text begin NFPA 105. new text end new text begin "NFPA 105" means the current adopted version of the Standard for Smoke Door Assemblies and Other Opening Protectives. new text end new text begin Subd. 19. new text end new text begin Nondedicated smoke control system. new text end new text begin "Nondedicated smoke control system" means a smoke control system that shares components with some other system, such as the building HVAC system, that changes its mode of operation to achieve the smoke-control objective. new text end new text begin Subd. 20. new text end new text begin Qualified fire smoke damper inspector. new text end new text begin "Qualified fire smoke damper inspector" means: new text end new text begin (1) an authorized state or local fire department personnel; new text end new text begin (2) the holder of a valid license delineated in section 326B.31, subdivision 2, 8, 9, 25, or 30; or new text end new text begin (3) a technician certified by the ICB as a fire smoke damper technician or through an equivalent certification program accredited under the ISO/IEC 17024 personnel certification. The technician must be employed by an independent contractor that provides fire life safety damper inspection services and shall: new text end new text begin (i) maintain current workers' compensation insurance coverage; new text end new text begin (ii) hold an ICB Fire and smoke damper contractor certification, or equivalent certification, from an organization that has been accredited under the ISO/IEC 17024 Personnel Certification standard in fire life safety damper inspections; and new text end new text begin (iii) participate in an approved skill training program. new text end new text begin Subd. 21. new text end new text begin Qualified smoke control system inspector. new text end new text begin "Qualified smoke control system inspector" means: new text end new text begin (1) an authorized state or local fire department personnel; new text end new text begin (2) the holder of a valid license delineated in section 326B.31, subdivision 2, 8, 9, 25, or 30; or new text end new text begin (3) a technician certified by ICB as a smoke control systems technician or through an equivalent certification program accredited under the ISO/IEC 17024 personnel certification. A smoke control systems technician shall also be a TABB technician certified by the Associated Air Balance Council, the National Environmental Balancing Bureau, or the Testing, Adjusting and Balancing Bureau. The technicians must be employed by an independent contractor that provides fire life safety damper testing services. The independent contractor must: new text end new text begin (i) maintain current workers' compensation insurance coverage; new text end new text begin (ii) hold an ICB smoke control system contractor certification or equivalent certification from an organization that has been accredited under the ISO/IEC 17024 Personnel Certification standard in smoke control systems inspections; and new text end new text begin (iii) participate in an approved skill training program. new text end new text begin Subd. 22. new text end new text begin Smoke control system. new text end new text begin "Smoke control system" means an engineered system that includes all methods that can be used singly or in combination to modify smoke movement, including engineered systems that use mechanical fans to produce pressure differences across smoke barriers to inhibit smoke movement. new text end new text begin Subd. 23. new text end new text begin Smoke damper. new text end new text begin "Smoke damper" means a device within an air distribution system to control the movement of smoke. Smoke damper includes devices installed in air conditioning systems to control the movement of smoke. A smoke damper also includes a combination fire smoke damper. new text end new text begin Subd. 24. new text end new text begin Subsidiary. new text end new text begin "Subsidiary" means any corporation or other organization, whether incorporated or unincorporated, in which the company owns, directly or indirectly, any equity or other ownership interest. new text end Sec. 2. new text begin [299F.491] FIRE LIFE SAFETY DAMPER SYSTEM. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Requirement. new text end new text begin The owner of a building shall establish a fire life safety damper and smoke control system inspection verification program to ensure that fire life safety dampers and smoke control systems are in working order to prevent the spread of fire and smoke throughout a building. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Required testing. new text end new text begin (a) All owners of buildings are responsible for ensuring that newly installed fire life safety dampers are subject to fire life safety damper testing under this section or under rules adopted by the state fire marshal before use is permitted. new text end new text begin (b) The testing of fire life safety dampers must include the visual inspection method in applicable chapters in accordance with NFPA 80, NFPA 101, and NFPA 105. new text end new text begin (c) Once installed, a building owner must periodically inspect and test fire life safety dampers no less than once after the first year of installation, and once every four years thereafter, except for hospitals. In hospitals, the building owner must inspect and test fire life safety dampers no less than once after the first year of installation and once every six years thereafter. The periodic testing of fire life safety dampers must include the visual inspection method in accordance with NFPA 80, NFPA 101, and NFPA 105. The remote inspection method, as defined in NFPA 80, NFPA 101, and NFPA 105 must not be used in place of visual inspection for the periodic testing required under this subdivision. All fire and smoke dampers must be tested as required under this section regardless of location. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Required qualifications of individual testers of fire smoke dampers. new text end new text begin (a) The state fire marshal shall establish and administer a program to review and approve third-party inspection training and certification programs to ensure conformance to the minimum qualifications under this section. new text end new text begin (b) Inspections and tests under this section must be performed by a qualified inspector. For the purposes of this section, a "qualified inspector" means: new text end new text begin (1) authorized state or local fire department personnel; or new text end new text begin (2) qualified fire smoke damper inspector. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Required testing of smoke control systems. new text end new text begin (a) A building owner is responsible for ensuring that smoke control systems under this section are tested for acceptance as required by the applicable NFPA standards referenced in this section or as set forth in rules adopted by the state fire marshal. new text end new text begin (b) Once installed, the building owner must periodically inspect and test smoke control systems at the following intervals: new text end new text begin (1) dedicated smoke control systems shall be tested at least semiannually; and new text end new text begin (2) nondedicated smoke control systems shall be tested at least annually. new text end new text begin (c) Testing of smoke control systems shall include tests to determine that airflow quantities and pressure differences are code compliant, including at the following locations: new text end new text begin (1) across smoke barrier openings; new text end new text begin (2) at the air makeup supplies; and new text end new text begin (3) at smoke exhaust equipment. new text end new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Required qualifications of individual testers of smoke control systems. new text end new text begin (a) The state fire marshal shall establish and administer a program to review and approve third-party inspection training and certification programs to ensure conformance to the minimum qualifications set forth in this section. new text end new text begin (b) Inspections and tests under this section shall be performed by a qualified inspector. For the purposes of this section, qualified inspector means: new text end new text begin (1) authorized state or local fire department personnel; or new text end new text begin (2) a qualified smoke control system inspector. new text end new text begin Subd. 6. new text end new text begin Certificate of operation. new text end new text begin (a) If the fire life safety dampers, smoke control systems, or HVAC duct system that contains a fire life safety damper or is part of a smoke control system pass the applicable inspections and tests, the person performing the inspection or test shall execute a certificate of operation verifying compliance with this section. The certificate of operation shall provide the following information: new text end new text begin (1) the name and certification number of the individual conducting the inspection or test; new text end new text begin (2) the name of the inspector's employer; new text end new text begin (3) the name of the building owner and address of the property; new text end new text begin (4) the location of all smoke dampers, fire dampers, combination fire/smoke dampers, and smoke control systems inspected or tested; and new text end new text begin (5) the date of the inspection or test. new text end new text begin (b) The building owner shall maintain a copy of the certificate of operation on the building property and make the certificate available for inspection upon request. new text end new text begin Subd. 7. new text end new text begin Testing failures. new text end new text begin (a) In the event an inspection or test reveals deficiencies in fire life safety dampers or smoke control systems, the person who conducted the inspection or test shall prepare a deficiency report for the building owner identifying the nature of the deficiency and reasons for noncompliance. The deficiency report shall also contain the name and certification number of the individual conducting the inspection or test and that person's employer; the name of the building owner; address of the property; the location of all fire dampers, smoke dampers, combination fire smoke dampers, and smoke control systems inspected or tested; and the date of the inspection or test. The building owner shall take the necessary steps to ensure the defective equipment is replaced or repaired and that compliance with the applicable inspection and testing requirements have been achieved. A building owner who does not comply within 30 days is in violation of this section. new text end new text begin (b) The building owner shall post a notice of verification of the testing and inspection of fire life safety dampers and smoke control systems in the outside lobby window of the building or other area clearly visible to the public. The verification shall state the address of the building and the date of the last fire life safety damper inspection, smoke control system inspection, and the date that each inspection expires. new text end new text begin Subd. 8. new text end new text begin Submissions and inspections. new text end new text begin (a) Building owners shall submit copies of operation certificates to the state fire marshal documenting compliance with the testing requirements of this section within 30 days of obtaining certificates of operation. The state fire marshal shall commence enforcement actions for any instance of noncompliance. new text end new text begin (b) When the state fire marshal conducts an annual fire inspection of any building, it shall inspect the building owner's fire life safety dampers, smoke control systems, and HVAC duct system that contain a fire life safety damper or is part of a smoke control system control system certificate of operation to ensure it complies with the requirements of this section and commence enforcement actions if violations are found. new text end new text begin Subd. 9. new text end new text begin Enforcement and penalties. new text end new text begin The state fire marshal shall assess a $100 civil penalty for each day of noncompliance to any building owner in violation of this section. new text end new text begin Subd. 10. new text end new text begin Rulemaking. new text end new text begin The commissioner of public safety shall adopt rules to carry out the provisions of this section. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin Subdivisions 1 to 4 are effective one year after publication in the State Register of rules adopted under subdivision 10. Subdivisions 5 to 9 are effective the day following final enactment of rules adopted under subdivision 10. Subdivision 10 is effective the day following final enactment. new text end Sec. 3. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE.new text end new text begin Unless otherwise provided, this act takes effect the day following enactment of administrative rules to review and approve third-party inspection training and certification programs by the state fire marshal or July 1, 2025, whichever occurs first. new text end